Tennessee, session 114, HB2466.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-7-115, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) Each district attorney general shall provide an annual report by March 1 of
each year to the governor, speaker of the house of representatives, speaker of the
senate, chair of the committee of the house of representatives with jurisdiction over
subject matters pertaining to district attorneys general, chair of the judiciary committee of
the senate, and district attorneys general conference and make such report available to
the public upon request. The report must contain, at a minimum, for the previous year,
the following aggregate, non-personally identifying information, categorized by offense:
(1) The number of indictments filed;
(2) The number of cases transferred for pro tem prosecution under § 8-7-
106; and
(3) The number of each disposition entered by a criminal or circuit court
in that district attorney general's judicial district, including dismissals, pretrial
diversions, plea agreements, trial outcomes, and sentences imposed.
(b) This section does not require a district attorney general to use any
designated system, whether physical or digital, to maintain the data to be reported. A
district attorney general may collect the required data in the way that best fits the design
of the district attorney general's local criminal justice systems.
HB2466
011323
- 1 -

(c) It is the duty of the clerk of every court having jurisdiction over misdemeanor
and felony cases to provide each district attorney general and the district attorneys
general conference direct and unlimited access to the clerk's case management or
reporting system for the purposes of complying with the duty to collect, analyze, and
report data on the information required by subdivisions (a)(1)-(3). The clerk shall
cooperate with each district attorney general and the district attorneys general
conference and provide all data and information upon request.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-425(f), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead the following:
(f) It is the duty of the clerk of every court having jurisdiction over misdemeanor
and felony cases to provide the district attorneys general conference direct and unlimited
access to the clerk's case management or reporting system for the purposes of
complying with the duty to collect and analyze data as required by this section. The
clerk shall cooperate with the district attorneys general conference and provide all data
and information upon request.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-7-314, is amended by
redesignating the current section as subsection (a) and adding the following new subsection:
(b) It is the duty of the clerk of every court having jurisdiction over misdemeanor
and felony cases to provide the district attorneys general conference direct and unlimited
access to the clerk's case management or reporting system for the purposes of
complying with the duty to compile a statewide report as required by subsection (a). The
clerk shall cooperate with the district attorneys general conference and provide all data
and information upon request.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, at 12:01 a.m., the public welfare
requiring it.
- 2 - 011323